District of Columbia statutes.
47-421

Repealed

Interest.

Repealed.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-20, § 2, 24 DCR 3339
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(e), 48 DCR 334
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 12(c), 51 DCR 881
1981 Ed., § 47-421.
1973 Ed., § 47-331.
Appropriation: Section 111 of Pub. L. 104-194, 110 Stat. 2365, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1997, provided that there are appropriated from the applicable funds of the District of Columbia such sums as may be necessary for making payments authorized by the District of Columbia Revenue Recovery Act of 1977.